src/fst/stems/adverbs.lexc
!! Adverbs
!  -------
!! Adverbs in Klingon 

LEXICON Adverbs
batlh+Adv:batlh    #  ;
bong+Adv:bong    #  ;
chaq+Adv:chaq    #  ;
chIch+Adv:chIch    #  ;
DaH+Adv:DaH    #  ;
Do’+Adv:Do’    #  ;
loQ+Adv:loQ    #  ;
nom+Adv:nom    #  ;
not+Adv:not    #  ;
pay’+Adv:pay’    #  ;
pIj+Adv:pIj    #  ;
QIt+Adv:QIt    #  ;
reH+Adv:reH    #  ;
rut+Adv:rut    #  ;
tugh+Adv:tugh    #  ;
vaj+Adv:vaj    #  ;
wej+Adv:wej    #  ;
neH+Adv:neH    #  ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
